Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 8

Department of Education

4-3-801. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of education.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of education, created by §4-3-101 and this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Acts 2015, ch. 129, § 3 provides that the Department of Education shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Education, Health and General Welfare no later than December 1, 2015, to update the Committee on the Department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the November 2014 performance audit report.

Acts 2019, ch. 336, § 3 provides that the department of education shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on education, health and general welfare no later than March 15, 2019, to update the committee on the department's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the December 2018 performance audit report.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of education, §4-3-101.

Department of education representatives as ex officio members of child sexual abuse task force, §37-1-603.

4-3-802. Commissioner — Qualifications — Appointment.

The chief executive officer of the department of education shall be the commissioner of education.

The commissioner shall be a person of literary and scientific attainments and of skill and experience in school administration. The commissioner shall also be qualified to teach in the school of the highest standing over which the commissioner has authority.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor.

Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 4; Shan. Supp., §§ 1487a19-1487a21; mod. Code 1932, §§ 2310-2312; Acts 1937, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2312; Acts 1970, ch. 601, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 49-103.

4-3-803. Offices — Powers and duties.

The department of education shall have its offices in the state capitol and its commissioner is vested with such powers and required to perform such duties as are set forth in title 49, and is charged with the administration of such laws as the general assembly from time to time may enact.

Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1487a18; mod. Code 1932, § 2309; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 49-104; modified.